Arkansas, session 2025, HB1775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1202(a)(1), concerning the valuation
procedures for property for purposes of property taxes, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1)(A) Each separate parcel of real property shall be valued at its
true market value in money, excluding the value of crops growing thereon.
(B)(i) Residential property used as the principal place of
residence of the owner shall not be subdivided into multiple parcels to
create a separate parcel for an accessory dwelling unit.
(ii) Residential property used as the principal
*JLL266*
03/13/2025 7:25:44 AM JLL266

HB1775
place of residence of the owner, including any accessory dwelling unit, shall
be valued and assessed as a single parcel of residential property.
(iii) As used in this subdivision (a)(1)(B),
"accessory dwelling unit" means a secondary dwelling unit that is:
(a) Located on the same parcel as the primary
single-family residence;
(b) Independent of and smaller than the
primary single-family residence; and
(c) Owned by the same person as the primary
single-family residence.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for
assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.























03/13/2025 7:25:44 AM JLL266